Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2707
Financial institution, defined.

Financial institution shall mean a state or federally chartered bank, a capital stock state building and loan association, a capital stock federal savings and loan association, a capital stock federal savings bank, and a capital stock state savings bank.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 21.